Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 390.225, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Property of unknown decedents. If the deleted text begin namedeleted text end new text begin identitynew text end of the decedent is not knownnew text begin and the county is completing disposition of the decedent's remains in accordance with section 390.21new text end , the coroner or medical examiner deleted text begin shall release such property to the county for disposal or sale. If the unknown decedent's identity is established and if a representative shall qualify within six years from the time of such sale, the county administrator, or a designee, shall pay the amount of the proceeds of the sale to the representative on behalf of the estate upon order of the court. If no order is made within six years, the proceeds of the sale shall become a part of the general revenue of the countydeleted text end new text begin may place the decedent's personal property with the decedent for burial, arrange for long-term storage of the decedent's personal property, or arrange for direct disposition of the decedent's personal property in accordance with section 525.393new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 525.393, is amended to read: 525.393 DISPOSAL BY CORONERnew text begin OR MEDICAL EXAMINERnew text end . deleted text begin Whendeleted text end new text begin (a) A coroner or medical examiner must complete a full inventory of a decedent'snew text end personal property deleted text begin of a decedent has come into thedeleted text end new text begin taken into new text end custody deleted text begin of anydeleted text end new text begin by thenew text end coroner deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin or medical examiner. For property thatnew text end has not been surrendered deleted text begin as hereinafter provided and no will has been admitted to probate or no administration has been had within three months after the decedent's death, the coroner, after the expiration of said time, shall file in the court an inventory of all such property and a fingerprint of each finger of each hand of the decedent. Wearing apparel and such other property as the coroner determines to be of nominal value, may be surrendered by the coroner to the spouse or to any blood relative of the decedent. If no will is admitted to probate nor administration had within six months after death, the coroner shall sell the same at public auction upon such notice and in such manner as the court may direct. The coroner shall be allowed reasonable expenses for the care and sale of the property, and shall deposit the net proceeds of such sale with the county treasurer in the name of the decedent, if known. The treasurer shall give the coroner duplicate receipts therefor, one of which the coroner shall file with the county auditor and the other in the court. If a representative shall qualify within six years from the time of such deposit, the treasurer shall pay the same to such representativedeleted text end new text begin in accordance with section 390.225 and for which no claim has been made within six months after the decedent's death, the coroner or medical examiner may dispose of the property as described in paragraph (b)new text end . new text begin (b) After expiration of the time period in paragraph (a), a coroner or medical examiner may surrender the decedent's personal property to any known blood relative of the decedent or to the person with the right to control disposition of the decedent's remains, or may otherwise sell or dispose of the personal property in a manner directed by the coroner or medical examiner. Sale or disposal of personal property according to this paragraph renders the personal property unavailable for future claims. The coroner or medical examiner is permitted to deposit revenue from the sale of personal property to the office financial account to recover reasonable expenses. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end